New York, session 2025-2026, S7201.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 10-1010 of the village law, as amended by chapter 2 481 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 10-1010 Election of company officers and delegates. Each of the 4 several companies whose members constitute the fire department of the 5 village shall hold an annual meeting on the first Tuesday in April in 6 each year, except those fire companies constituting the fire department 7 of the village of Fishkill, Dutchess county, and the village of Croton- 8 on-Hudson, Westchester county, which shall hold such annual meetings on 9 the first Tuesday in December of each year. At such meeting the members 10 of each company shall elect by ballot from their own number a captain 11 and a lieutenant, and such further officers if any as may be provided 12 for in the by-laws of the company, who must be approved by the board of 13 fire commissioners, one warden and one delegate to the general conven- 14 tion of the fire department. The terms of office of the captain and 15 lieutenant and such further officers if any, as are elected as herein 16 provided, shall be one year, the wardens two years, and the delegates 17 three years, respectively, and any vacancies occurring in any such 18 offices shall be filled by election in like manner. At the first annual 19 meeting after this act takes effect two wardens and three delegates 20 shall be elected, the wardens to serve for one and two years, respec- 21 tively, and the delegates for one, two and three years, respectively. 22 Any person who has been convicted of arson in any degree shall not be 23 eligible for election to the office of captain, lieutenant, warden, 24 delegate and any other offices provided for in the by-laws of the compa- 25 ny. Any captain, lieutenant, warden, delegate or other officer of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11526-01-5 S. 7201 2 1 company who is convicted of arson in any degree during [his] their term 2 of office shall be disqualified from completing such term of office. 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 10-1012 of the village law, as amended 4 by chapter 380 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 5 1. The chief and the first and second assistant chiefs and such addi- 6 tional assistant chiefs, if any, as may be provided for in the by-laws 7 of the fire department shall each be a member thereof and a resident of 8 the state of New York; provided, however, that fire department officers 9 of the fire department of the village of Hancock, Delaware county, need 10 not be residents of the state of New York. In addition, the board of 11 trustees, or the board of fire commissioners subject to the approval of 12 the board of trustees, may, by resolution, require that any or all of 13 such fire department officers shall be residents of the village. The 14 delegates elected to the general convention of the fire department shall 15 meet at the council room thereof on the Thursday following the first 16 Tuesday in April, except the elected delegates of the fire department of 17 the village of Fishkill, Dutchess county, which shall meet on the first 18 Tuesday in December, and nominate a person for each of such offices and 19 except the elected delegates of the fire department of the village of 20 Croton-on-Hudson, Westchester county, which shall meet on the Thursday 21 following the first Tuesday in December; but the fire commissioners of 22 any village may adopt a rule requiring all such nominations to be made 23 on the day of the meeting by a vote of the duly qualified members of the 24 department, in which case the meeting of the delegates in general 25 convention, as provided for in this section, shall be dispensed with. 26 The person acting as secretary of such convention shall forthwith file 27 in the office of the village clerk a certificate of such nominations. 28 The board of fire commissioners at its next meeting shall consider the 29 nominations and appoint such persons to the offices to which they are 30 respectively nominated or, if a nomination is not approved the board 31 shall reconvene the general convention, which shall submit a new nomi- 32 nation to take the place of any nomination not approved, which procedure 33 shall continue until a full set of officers is approved. A person who 34 has been convicted of arson in any degree shall not be eligible for 35 nomination, election or appointment to the office of chief or assistant 36 chief. Any fire chief or assistant chief who is convicted of arson in 37 any degree during [his] their term of office shall be disqualified from 38 completing such term of office. 39 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.